Hawaii statutes.
C.
Revocation of Certificate of Authority

§414-461 Grounds for revocation. The
department director may commence a proceeding under section 414-462 to revoke
the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this State if:

(1) The corporation fails to:

(A) Pay any fees prescribed by law;

(B) File its annual report for a period of
two years;

(C) Appoint and maintain an agent for service
of process as required; or

(D) File a statement of a change in the name
or business address of the agent as required; or

(2) A misrepresentation has been made of any material
matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record or document
submitted by the corporation. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §48;
am L 2002, c 130, §34; am L 2003, c 124, §16]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next